Georgia statutes. TITLE 32 Highways, Bridges, and Ferries
Article 3 Officers

32-2-40.
Selection of commissioner of transportation; term; vacancy; bond; other elective office.

The commissioner of transportation shall be the chief executive officer of the department.

The commissioner, his successor, and each succeeding commissioner thereafter shall be selected by a vote of the majority of the total number of members of the board. At the time of said vote, the board shall stipulate the term the commissioner shall serve, and said commissioner shall serve during the stipulated term and until his successor is selected by the board and duly qualified. The board shall stipulate one of the following to be the term of the commissioner:

The commissioner shall serve at the pleasure of the board; or

The commissioner shall serve any term specified by the board up to and including a maximum of four years; however, the board shall not specify a term of office that extends beyond the end of the term of the Governor in office at the time the commissioner’s term is scheduled to begin.

If the board stipulates that the commissioner shall serve under the provisions of paragraph (2) of this subsection, upon a vote of the majority of the total members of the board, the commissioner shall be subject to removal by the board for just cause after reasonable notice, copy of charge, hearing, and opportunity for presentation of evidence. In the event of a vacancy in the office of the commissioner by reason of resignation, removal, death, or permanent incapacity and inability to perform the duties of the office, the deputy commissioner shall become acting commissioner to serve until such time as the board at any regular or called meeting selects a new commissioner to fill the unexpired term of office created by such vacancy.

The commissioner shall qualify, upon selection, by executing a bond in the amount of $100,000.00 with a corporate surety licensed to do business in this state and payable to the Governor and his successors in office, such bond to be approved by the Governor and conditioned on the faithful discharge of his duties as commissioner. The premium of such bond shall be paid from funds of the department.

The commissioner shall devote full time and attention to the duties and responsibilities of his office. No person who serves as commissioner shall be eligible, except as hereinafter provided in this subsection, to qualify as a candidate in any primary, special, or general election for any state or federal elective office nor to hold any such office, except as hereinafter provided in this subsection, during the time he serves as commissioner and for a period of 12 months after the date he ceases to serve as commissioner. However, nothing contained in this subsection shall prevent the commissioner from being appointed to any other office nor disqualify him from running in any election to succeed himself in any office to which he was appointed nor to hold such office in the event he is elected thereto and otherwise qualified therefor; provided, however, that the commissioner shall resign as commissioner of transportation before accepting any such appointive office.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-308, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 400, § 1.

Cross references.

Official bonds generally, T. 45, C. 4.

32-2-41.
Powers, duties, and authority of commissioner; establishment of divisions.

As the chief executive officer of the department, the commissioner shall have direct and full control of the department. He or she shall possess, exercise, and perform all the duties, powers, and authority which may be vested in the department by law, except those duties, powers, and authority which are expressly reserved by law to the board or the director of planning. The commissioner’s principal responsibility shall be the faithful implementation of transportation plans produced by the director of planning and approved by the Governor and the State Transportation Board, subject to the terms of such appropriations Acts as may be adopted from time to time. The commissioner shall also be responsible for the duties and activities assigned to the commissioner in Article 5 of Chapter 8 of Title 48. When the board is not in regular or called session, the commissioner shall perform, exercise, and possess all duties, powers, and authority of the board except:

Approval of the advertising of nonnegotiated construction contracts; and

Approval of authority lease agreements.

The commissioner shall also have the authority to exercise the power of eminent domain and to execute all contracts, authority lease agreements, and all other functions except those that cannot legally be delegated to him or her by the board.

The commissioner shall have the authority to employ, discharge, promote, supervise, and determine the compensation of such personnel as he or she may deem necessary or useful to the effective operation and administration of the department except that the commissioner shall not employ a person who is related within the second degree of consanguinity to the commissioner or any member of the board, provided that such prohibition shall not be applied so as to terminate the employment of persons employed before said prohibited relationship was created by the subsequent election of a board member or appointment of a commissioner.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b) of Code Section 32-6-29, the commissioner shall have the authority to appoint and employ five nonuniformed investigators who shall be certified peace officers pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 8 of Title 35, the “Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Act.” The investigators shall have full arrest powers in cases involving internal affairs of the department and in cases involving obstruction of, encroaching on, or injury to public roads or rights of way. In such cases, the investigators shall be authorized:

To investigate Department of Transportation related crimes committed anywhere in the state;

To arrest any person violating the criminal laws of this state;

To serve and execute warrants after notifying the law enforcement agency of the local jurisdiction of the intent to serve such warrant or warrants;

To enforce in general the criminal laws of this state;

To issue citations for civil damage to any person found to be violating the laws, rules, and regulations pertaining to vegetation management; and

To carry firearms while performing their duties but only if such investigators have been certified by the Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council as having successfully completed the course of training required by Chapter 8 of Title 35, the “Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Act.”

The power granted to the commissioner in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be subject to and limited by Article 1 of Chapter 20 of Title 45 establishing a merit system for department employees, to the extent that the same or any amendments thereto are now or may be hereafter applicable to department personnel.

There shall be a Planning Division of the department, directed and staffed by the director of planning, which shall be the department’s principal unit for developing the state transportation improvement program and the state-wide strategic transportation plan and coordinating transportation policies, planning, and programs related to design, construction, maintenance, operations, and financing of transportation, under the supervision of the director. The division and the director shall not have jurisdiction over the funds allocated for the local maintenance and improvement grant program pursuant to subsection (d) of Code Section 32-5-27 except as expressly provided by said subsection.

There shall be an Engineering Division of the department to be supervised by the chief engineer, a Finance Division of the department to be supervised by the treasurer, an Administration Division of the department to be supervised by the deputy commissioner, an Intermodal Division to be supervised by an appointee serving at the pleasure of the commissioner, and a Local Grants Division to be supervised by an appointee serving at the pleasure of the commissioner. The duties, responsibilities, and personnel of each such division shall be as established by the commissioner.

The commissioner may establish a Construction Division, an Operations and Maintenance Division, a Permitting Division, and a Public-Private Initiatives Division of the department. The commissioner shall assign to such divisions, except as otherwise provided by law, such personnel and such duties and responsibilities as may be necessary and appropriate for the proper functioning of the department.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-309, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1422, § 12; Ga. L. 1994, p. 591, § 3; Ga. L. 2004, p. 898, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 976, § 5/SB 200; Ga. L. 2010, p. 396, § .1/SB 305; Ga. L. 2010, p. 778, § 1.1/HB 277; Ga. L. 2010, p. 818, § 2/SB 520.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1991, “authority lease agreements” was substituted for “authority-lease agreements” in paragraph (a)(2) and in the undesignated language at the end of subsection (a).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 778, § 1/HB 277, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Transportation Investment Act of 2010.’ ”

Law reviews.

For annual survey of law on administrative law, see 62 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2010).

32-2-41.1.
State-wide strategic transportation plan.

The director shall prepare a state-wide strategic transportation plan. Such plan shall be updated and delivered in coordination with the state-wide, intermodal transportation plan as defined in 23 C.F.R. Section 450.104. The director shall prepare the state-wide strategic transportation plan for the Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the chairpersons of the Senate Transportation Committee and House Committee on Transportation.

History.

Code 1981, §

32-2-41.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 528, § 1/HB 1189; Ga. L. 2009, p. 976, § 6/SB 200; Ga. L. 2014, p. 851, § 1/HB 774; Ga. L. 2020, p. 371, § 1/HB 1098.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, rewrote this Code section.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2008, Code Section 32-2-41.1, as enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 806, § 1/SB 417, was redesignated as Code Section 32-2-41.2.

32-2-41.2.
Development of benchmarks; reports; value engineering studies.

The commissioner shall develop and publish in print or electronically benchmarks, based upon the type and scope of a construction project, that detail a realistic time frame for completion of each stage of a construction project, including preliminary engineering and design, environmental permitting and review, and right of way acquisition.

The director shall submit an annual report to the Governor, the Lieutenant Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the chairpersons of the House and Senate Transportation Committees detailing the progress of every construction project valued at $10 million or more against the benchmarks. This report shall include an analysis explaining the discrepancies between the benchmarks and actual performance on each project as well as an explanation for delays. This report shall also be published on the website of the department.

The department shall create and maintain on its website a detailed status report on each project under planning or construction. This status report shall include, but not be limited to, the name and contact information of the project manager, if applicable.

Value engineering studies shall be performed on all projects whose costs exceed $50 million, except for any project procured in accordance with Code Sections 32-2-79, 32-2-80, and 32-2-81, and the director shall submit an annual report to the Governor, the Lieutenant Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the chairpersons of the House and Senate Transportation Committees detailing the amount saved due to the value engineering studies. This report shall also be published on the website of the department.

History.

Code 1981, §

32-2-41.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 806, § 1/SB 417; Ga. L. 2009, p. 976, § 7/SB 200; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 10/SB 388; Ga. L. 2013, p. 67, § 1/HB 202; Ga. L. 2014, p. 851, § 2/HB 774.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2008, Code Section 32-2-41.1, as enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 806, § 1/SB 417, was redesignated as Code Section 32-2-41.2.

32-2-41.3.
Georgia Freight Railroad Program.

For purposes of this Code section, the term “short line railway” means any carrier designated as a Class III by the Surface Transportation Board.

The Georgia Freight Railroad Program shall be administered, subject to appropriations, at the discretion of the commissioner, in order to enhance the state’s investment in freight rail projects for public benefit and to support a safe and balanced transportation system for the state.

Eligible projects under the Georgia Freight Railroad Program shall include rail enhancement projects to acquire, lease, or improve railways or railroad equipment, including rail crossings, rolling stock, rights of way, or rail facilities; rail preservation projects to acquire, lease, or improve short line railways or assist other appropriate entities to acquire, lease, or improve short line railways; and rail industrial projects to build, construct, restructure, or improve industrial access to railroad tracks and related facilities.

In administering the program, the commissioner shall make every effort to balance such program among all regions of this state and among the various applicants.

Following the end of each fiscal year, the commissioner or his or her designee shall submit an annual report on the activities of the Georgia Freight Railroad Program to the Governor, the Lieutenant Governor, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives and shall make such report available to the members of the General Assembly.

Prior to the expenditure of state funds, the commissioner shall make a determination whether such expenditure is ample consideration for a substantial public benefit in compliance with Article III, Section VI, Paragraph VI(a) of the Georgia Constitution. Such substantial public benefit must constitute a benefit accrued to the public in the form of enhanced public safety, enhanced mobility of goods, congestion mitigation, enhanced trade and economic development, improved air quality or land use, reduction of public expenditures due to improved transportation efficiency or infrastructure preservation, or other public benefits identified and approved by a majority of the board. Such public benefit shall also align with goals in the state-wide strategic transportation plan as defined in Code Section 32-2-41.1 or the state’s freight plan as defined in 49 U.S.C. 70202.

History.

Code 1981, §

32-2-41.3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 816, § 1/HB 820; Ga. L. 2020, p. 817, § 1/SB 371; Ga. L. 2021, p. 480, § 1/HB 588.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective January 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in subsection (f), substituted “VI(a)” for “VI (a)” near the end of the first sentence, and added the second and third sentences.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2020, the enactment of subsection (c) of this Code section by Ga. L. 2020, p. 816, § 1/HB 820, was treated as impliedly repealed and superseded by Ga. L. 2020, p. 817, § 1/SB 371, due to irreconcilable conflict.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on commercial transportation, see
73 Mercer L. Rev. 47 (2021).

32-2-42.
Deputy commissioner of transportation; chief engineer; treasurer and assistant treasurer.

The commissioner shall appoint a deputy commissioner of transportation to serve at the pleasure of the commissioner. Before assuming the duties of his or her office, the deputy commissioner shall qualify by giving bond with a corporate surety licensed to do business in this state, such bond to be in the amount of $500,000.00 and payable to the Governor and his or her successors in office. The bond shall be subject to the approval of the Governor and shall be conditioned on the faithful discharge of the duties of the office, including any duties of the office of the commissioner which the deputy commissioner may be required to perform as acting commissioner. The premium for the bond shall be paid out of the funds of the department. The deputy commissioner shall be the assistant commissioner and shall be empowered to act in his or her own name for the commissioner. The deputy commissioner may exercise to the extent permitted by law only such powers and duties of the commissioner as have been previously assigned to him or her in writing by the commissioner. In the event of the commissioner’s temporary incapacity which causes his or her absence from the offices of the Department of Transportation in Atlanta, Georgia, for 30 consecutive days, the deputy commissioner shall assume all the powers and duties of the commissioner, to be exercised until such time as the commissioner’s temporary absence or incapacity shall cease. In the event of the commissioner’s permanent incapacity, the deputy commissioner shall become acting commissioner, as provided in subsection (c) of Code Section 32-2-40.

The commissioner shall appoint a chief engineer to serve at the pleasure of the commissioner. The chief engineer shall be the chief engineer of the department and shall be a professional engineer registered in accordance with Chapter 15 of Title 43 and who shall be experienced in highway engineering.

The commissioner shall appoint a treasurer of the department to serve at the pleasure of the commissioner. Before assuming the duties of his or her office, the treasurer shall qualify by giving bond with a corporate surety licensed to do business in this state, such bond to be in the amount of $500,000.00 and payable to the Governor and his or her successors in office. The bond shall be subject to the approval of the Governor and shall be conditioned on the faithful discharge of the duties of the office. The premium for the bond shall be paid out of the funds of the department. The duties of the treasurer shall be to receive all funds from all sources to which the department is entitled, to account for all funds received by the department, to adjust for additional appropriations or balances brought forward from previous years with the prior approval of the Office of Planning and Budget, and to perform such other duties as may be required of him or her by the commissioner. The commissioner shall have the authority to appoint an assistant treasurer in the same manner and under the same conditions as set forth in this subsection for the appointment of the treasurer, including the qualifying in advance by giving bond of the same type, amount, and paid for in the same manner as required of the treasurer. The assistant treasurer shall assume the duties of office of treasurer upon the incapacity or death of the treasurer and shall serve until a new treasurer is appointed as provided in this subsection.

Any provision of this title or of any other statute or of any rule or regulation to the contrary notwithstanding, the commissioner or the deputy commissioner may, in addition to serving as commissioner or deputy commissioner, also simultaneously serve as chief engineer, provided that he or she shall be appointed and shall possess the qualifications as prescribed in subsection (b) of this Code section. A commissioner or deputy commissioner simultaneously serving as chief engineer shall be paid for the discharge of all his or her duties the sum to which he or she is entitled as commissioner or deputy commissioner.

History.

Ga. L. 1925, p. 208, § 2; Code 1933, § 95-1607; Ga. L. 1950, p. 62, § 7; Code 1933, § 95A-310, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 102, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 591, § 4; Ga. L. 2009, p. 976, § 8/SB 200; Ga. L. 2011, p. 583, § 2/HB 137.

Cross references.

Official bonds generally, T. 45, C. 4.

32-2-43.
Director of planning; appointment; responsibilities.

There shall be a director of planning appointed by the Governor subject to approval by a majority vote of both the House Transportation Committee and the Senate Transportation Committee. The director shall serve during the term of the Governor by whom he or she is appointed and at the pleasure of the Governor. If the Governor’s term expires and the incoming Governor has not made an appointment, the current director of planning may serve until a replacement is appointed by the incoming Governor and confirmed by the House and Senate Transportation Committees.

The director of planning’s principal responsibility shall be the development of transportation plans, including the development of the state-wide strategic transportation plan and state-wide transportation improvement program and other comprehensive plans pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 32-2-3 and Code Section 32-2-22, strategic transportation plans pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 32-2-41.1, and benchmarks and value engineering studies pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 32-2-41.2, in consultation with the board, the Governor, and the commissioner. The director shall also be responsible for the duties and activities assigned to the director in Article 5 of Chapter 8 of Title 48. The director shall be the director of the Planning Division of the department and shall possess, exercise, and perform all the duties, powers, and authority which may be vested in such division by law and are necessary or appropriate for such purpose, except those duties, powers, and authority which are expressly reserved by law to the board or the commissioner.

History.

Code 1981, §

32-2-43

, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 976, § 9/SB 200; Ga. L. 2010, p. 778, § 2/HB 277; Ga. L. 2011, p. 583, § 3/HB 137.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2009, “the” was deleted following “may be vested in” in the last sentence of subsection (b).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 778, § 1/HB 277, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Transportation Investment Act of 2010.’ ”